Maryland, session 2026, HB1551.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Agriculture
TITLE 17. REGULATION OF DOG BREEDERS.
17–101.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1551*

HOUSE BILL 1551
(A) IN THIS TITLE THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(B) “BREEDER” MEANS A PERSON THAT BREEDS DOGS IN THE STATE TO
SELL, EXCHANGE, OR OTHERWISE TRANSFER TO THE PUBLIC.
(C) “FUND” MEANS THE DOG BREEDER ACCOUNTABILITY FUND
ESTABLISHED UNDER § 17–102 OF THIS TITLE.
(D) “MICROCHIP” MEANS A RADIO–FREQUENCY IDENTIFICATION DEVICE
THAT COMPLIES WITH MICROCHIP STANDARDS SET BY THE INTERNATIONAL
ORGANIZATION FOR STANDARDIZATION.
(E) “PUPPY BIRTH CERTIFICATE” MEANS A BIRTH CERTIFICATE FOR A
PUPPY THAT IS ISSUED BY THE DEPARTMENT TO A BREEDER UNDER § 17–103(B) OF
THIS TITLE.
17–102.
(A) THERE IS A DOG BREEDER ACCOUNTABILITY FUND.
(B) THE PURPOSE OF THE FUND IS TO:
(1) PROMOTE BREEDER REGISTRATION AND ACCOUNTABILITY; AND
(2) PROVIDE FINANCIAL ASSISTANCE TO ANIMAL SHELTERS AND
SPAY/NEUTER PROGRAMS TO REDUCE SHELTER INTAKE AND IMPROVE SHELTER
OUTCOMES.
(C) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ADMINISTER THE FUND.
(D) (1) THE FUND IS A SPECIAL, NONLAPSING FUND THAT IS NOT
SUBJECT TO § 7–302 OF THE STATE FINANCE AND PROCUREMENT ARTICLE.
(2) THE STATE TREASURER SHALL HOLD THE FUND SEPARATELY,
AND THE COMPTROLLER SHALL ACCOUNT FOR THE FUND.
(E) THE FUND CONSISTS OF:
(1) REVENUE DISTRIBUTED TO THE FUND UNDER §§ 17–103 AND
17–106 OF THIS TITLE;

HOUSE BILL 1551 3
(2) MONEY APPROPRIATED IN THE STATE BUDGET TO THE FUND;
AND
(3) ANY OTHER MONEY FROM ANY OTHER SOURCE ACCEPTED FOR
THE BENEFIT OF THE FUND.
(F) THE FUND MAY BE USED ONLY AS FOLLOWS:
(1) 50% FOR FINANCIAL AWARDS TO ANIMAL SHELTERS AND
SPAY/NEUTER PROGRAMS;
(2) 30% FOR ADMINISTRATIVE EXPENSES; AND
(3) 20% FOR EDUCATION AND ENFORCEMENT ACTIVITIES.
(G) (1) THE STATE TREASURER SHALL INVEST THE MONEY OF THE FUND
IN THE SAME MANNER AS OTHER STATE MONEY MAY BE INVESTED.
(2) ANY INTEREST EARNINGS OF THE FUND SHALL BE CREDITED TO
THE GENERAL FUND OF THE STATE.
17–103.
(A) (1) ON OR BEFORE JULY 1, 2028, AND EACH YEAR THEREAFTER, A
BREEDER SHALL:
(I) REGISTER ANNUALLY WITH THE DEPARTMENT IN
ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SUBSECTION; AND
(II) AT THE TIME OF REGISTRATION, PAY TO THE DEPARTMENT
AN ANNUAL REGISTRATION FEE OF $150.
(2) AN ANNUAL REGISTRATION SHALL:
(I) BE SUBMITTED ON THE FORM THAT THE DEPARTMENT
PROVIDES; AND
(II) INCLUDE:
1. THE NAME OF THE BREEDER;
2. THE ADDRESS OF THE BREEDER;

HOUSE BILL 1551
3. THE NUMBER OF BREEDING FEMALES MAINTAINED
BY THE BREEDER FOR THE IMMEDIATELY PRECEDING CALENDAR YEAR;
4. THE NUMBER OF LITTERS MAINTAINED BY THE
BREEDER FOR THE IMMEDIATELY PRECEDING CALENDAR YEAR;
5. PROOF OF COMPLIANCE WITH LOCAL ZONING
REGULATIONS; AND
6. ANY OTHER INFORMATION REQUIRED BY THE
DEPARTMENT.
(B) (1) BEGINNING JULY 1, 2029, A BREEDER SHALL:
(I) WITHIN 30 DAYS AFTER THE BIRTH OF A LITTER, SUBMIT TO
THE DEPARTMENT AN APPLICATION FOR A BIRTH CERTIFICATE FOR EACH PUPPY
BORN IN THE LITTER ON THE FORM THAT THE DEPARTMENT PROVIDES; AND
(II) PAY TO THE DEPARTMENT AN APPLICATION FEE OF $50
FOR EACH PUPPY IDENTIFIED IN THE APPLICATION.
(2) EACH PUPPY BIRTH CERTIFICATE ISSUED BY THE DEPARTMENT
SHALL INCLUDE:
(I) THE REGISTRATION NUMBER ASSIGNED TO THE BREEDER;
(II) THE PARENTAGE OF THE PUPPY; AND
(III) FOR A PUPPY BORN ON OR AFTER JULY 1, 2030, THE
MICROCHIP IDENTIFICATION NUMBER ASSIGNED TO THE PUPPY.
(C) THE FEES COLLECTED BY THE DEPARTMENT UNDER THIS SECTION
SHALL BE DEPOSITED INTO THE FUND.
17–104.
BEGINNING JULY 1, 2028, A BREEDER MAY NOT SELL, EXCHANGE, OR
OTHERWISE TRANSFER TO THE PUBLIC A PUPPY UNLESS:
(1) THE BREEDER IS REGISTERED WITH THE DEPARTMENT UNDER §
17–103(A) OF THIS TITLE;

HOUSE BILL 1551 5
(2) FOR A PUPPY THAT IS BORN ON OR AFTER JULY 1, 2029, A PUPPY
BIRTH CERTIFICATE HAS BEEN ISSUED FOR THE PUPPY; AND
(3) FOR A PUPPY THAT IS BORN ON OR AFTER JULY 1, 2030, THE
PUPPY IS MICROCHIPPED AND THE MICROCHIP NUMBER MATCHES THE MICROCHIP
IDENTIFICATION NUMBER INCLUDED ON THE PUPPY’S BIRTH CERTIFICATE.
17–105.
(A) ON OR BEFORE JULY 1, 2027, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL:
(1) ADOPT REGULATIONS TO CARRY OUT THIS TITLE; AND
(2) DEVELOP A PUBLICLY ACCESSIBLE REGISTRY TO MAINTAIN
INFORMATION RELATED TO EACH BREEDER REGISTERED WITH THE DEPARTMENT
UNDER § 17–103(A) OF THIS TITLE, INCLUDING THE INFORMATION PROVIDED ON
EACH PUPPY BIRTH CERTIFICATE ISSUED BY THE DEPARTMENT TO THE BREEDER.
(B) ON OR BEFORE OCTOBER 1, 2029, AND EACH YEAR THEREAFTER, THE
DEPARTMENT SHALL REPORT TO THE GOVERNOR AND, IN ACCORDANCE WITH §
2–1257 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY ON THE
IMPLEMENTATION OF THIS TITLE, INCLUDING:
(1) THE NUMBER OF BREEDERS REGISTERED WITH THE
DEPARTMENT;
(2) THE AMOUNT AND SOURCE OF MONEY DEPOSITED INTO THE
FUND;
(3) THE ACTIVITIES AND PROGRAMS THAT HAVE RECEIVED
FINANCIAL ASSISTANCE FROM THE FUND; AND
(4) THE IMPACTS ON ANIMAL SHELTER INTAKE AND SHELTER
OUTCOMES.
17–106.
(A) (1) A PERSON WHO VIOLATES THIS TITLE IS SUBJECT TO AN
ADMINISTRATIVE PENALTY OF UP TO $5,000 PER VIOLATION.
(2) EACH LITTER OF PUPPIES THAT IS NOT REPORTED TO THE
DEPARTMENT IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS TITLE IS A SEPARATE VIOLATION.

HOUSE BILL 1551
(B) THE PENALTIES COLLECTED BY THE DEPARTMENT UNDER THIS
SECTION SHALL BE DEPOSITED INTO THE FUND.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.